New Jersey, session 221, A2652.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Philanthropy Act. 2.    a.  A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this State who provides care or treatment to at least 10 percent of the physicians patients in a calendar year without receiving any compensation for that care or treatment, shall not be liable in any action for noneconomic damages alleging medical malpractice against that physician in an amount that exceeds $250,000.  The $250,000 limit shall apply to cases arising out of care or treatment provided by the physician during the calendar year following the year the uncompensated care described in this subsection was provided. b.    The State Board of Medical Examiners shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), that establish procedures for: (1)   physicians to report, document, and certify the uncompensated care and treatment provided in a calendar year and the total number of patients who received care and treatment from the physician during that year; (2)   the board to verify that the reported uncompensated care and treatment was provided to more than 10 percent of the physicians patients; and (3)   the board to notify the physician and the Department of Banking and Insurance that the physician qualifies for the medical malpractice insurance limit. c.     Upon receipt of notification pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the physician may submit the notification to the physicians medical malpractice insurer and inform the insurer that the physician is subject to a limit of $250,000 in noneconomic damages for the calendar year. 3.    This act shall take effect on January 1 next following the date of enactment.